Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1901 to 38-1920 shall be known and may be cited
as the Medical Radiography Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 639;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 1.